Illinois, session 104th, HB3647.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Animal Welfare Act is amended by changing 5Section 3.5 and by adding Section 3.10 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 605/3.5)7    Sec. 3.5. Information on dogs and cats available for 8adoption by an animal shelter or animal control facility.9    (a) An animal shelter or animal control facility must 10provide to the adopter prior to the time of adoption the 11following information, to the best of its knowledge, on any 12dog or cat being offered for adoption:13        (1) The breed, age, date of birth, sex, and color of 14    the dog or cat if known, or if unknown, the animal shelter 15    or animal control facility shall estimate to the best of 16    its ability.17        (2) The details of any inoculation or medical 18    treatment that the dog or cat received while under the 19    possession of the animal shelter or animal control 20    facility.21        (3) The adoption fee and any additional fees or 22    charges.23        (4) If the dog or cat was returned by an adopter, then   HB3647- 2 -LRB104 08930 AAS 18985 b1    the date and reason for the return.2        (5) The following written statement: "A copy of our 3    policy regarding warranties, refunds, or returns is 4    available upon request.".5        (6) The license number of the animal shelter or animal 6    control facility issued by the Illinois Department of 7    Agriculture. 8        (7) For dogs or cats that were imported into this 9    State from another state by the animal shelter or animal 10    control facility, the examination document provided by the 11    licensed veterinarian who performed an examination as 12    required under Section 3.10. 13    (b) The information required in subsection (a) shall be 14provided to the adopter in written form by the animal shelter 15or animal control facility and shall have an acknowledgement 16of disclosures form, which must be signed by the adopter and an 17authorized representative of the animal shelter or animal 18control facility at the time of the adoption. The 19acknowledgement of disclosures form shall include the 20following:21        (1) A blank space for the dated signature and printed 22    name of the authorized representative handling the 23    adoption on behalf of the animal shelter or animal control 24    facility, which shall be immediately beneath the following 25    printed statement: "I hereby attest that all of the above 26    information is true and correct to the best of my   HB3647- 3 -LRB104 08930 AAS 18985 b1    knowledge.".2        (2) A blank space for the dated signature and printed 3    name of the adopter, which shall be immediately beneath 4    the following statement: "I hereby attest that this 5    disclosure was posted on or near the cage of the dog or cat 6    for adoption and that I have read all the disclosures. I 7    further understand that I am entitled to keep a signed 8    copy of this disclosure.".9    (c) A copy of the disclosures and the signed 10acknowledgement of disclosures form shall be provided to the 11adopter and the original copy shall be maintained by the 12animal shelter or animal control facility for a period of 2 13years from the date of adoption. A copy of the animal shelter's 14or animal control facility's policy regarding warranties, 15refunds, or returns shall be provided to the adopter.16    (d) An animal shelter or animal control facility shall 17post in a conspicuous place in writing on or near the cage of 18any dog or cat available for adoption the information required 19by subsection (a) of this Section 3.5.20(Source: P.A. 96-1470, eff. 1-1-11.) 21    (225 ILCS 605/3.10 new)22    Sec. 3.10. Examination of imported dogs and cats. A 23licensed veterinarian shall examine each dog or cat that is 24imported into this State from another state by an animal 25shelter or an animal control facility and provide an   HB3647- 4 -LRB104 08930 AAS 18985 b1examination document to the animal shelter or animal control 2facility.